Maine, session 132, LD111.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13451, sub-§3, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
OOOOO, §2, is further amended to read:
E. Fifty-five percent from July 1, 2021 to June 30, 2023; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §13451, sub-§3, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
OOOOO, §3, is amended to read:
F. Sixty percent after from July 1, 2023. to June 30, 2025;
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §13451, sub-§3, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Sixty-five percent from July 1, 2025 to June 30, 2026; and
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §13451, sub-§3, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Seventy percent after July 1, 2026.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.